Hawaii, session 2025, HB720.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State's current restrictions on the installation and use of sun screening devices, including window tinting, on motor vehicles have unintended, adverse consequences on public health, comfort, and property. In particular, the State's location within the tropics means Hawaii drivers experience more intense sunlight, hotter temperatures, and higher amounts of glare and sun exposure.  Due to the effects of climate change, temperatures are likely to get even hotter over the coming years and decades.  Tinted windows can help to increase comfort by lowering the interior temperature of the motor vehicle while also reducing glare, allowing commuters to drive more safely.  Tinted windows also help to block ultraviolet light, reducing health risks for drivers and their passengers while also protecting the vehicle's interior from sun damage. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to amend the State's regulation of sun screening devices on motor vehicles by lowering the allowable amount of light transmittance for vehicle windows from thirty‑five per cent, plus or minus six per cent, to twenty-five per cent, plus or minus five per cent. SECTION 2.  Section 291-21.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows: "(d)  This section shall not apply to: (1)  Rearview mirrors; (2)  Adjustable nontransparent sun visors which are mounted forward of the side windows and are not attached to the glazing material; (3)  Signs, stickers, or other materials which are displayed in a seven-inch square in the lower corner of the windshield farthest removed from the driver or signs, stickers, or other materials which are displayed in a five-inch square in the lower corner of the windshield nearest the driver; (4)  Rear trunk lid handle or hinges; (5)  Window wipers and window wiper motors; (6)  Transparent sun screening film materials which are installed, affixed, or applied along the top edge of the windshield so long as such materials do not encroach upon the AS-1 portion of the windshield as provided by Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard 205 or no lower than four inches below the top of the windshield, when measured from the middle point of the bottom edge of the top windshield moulding if no AS-1 markings can be found in the left or right upper margin of the windshield; (7)  Sun screening devices for front side wing vents and windows which, when used in conjunction with the glazing material have a light transmittance of no less than [thirty-five] twenty-five per cent plus or minus [six] five per cent; (8)  Sun screening devices for side windows necessary for driving visibility which are to the rear of the driver and for rear windows necessary for driving visibility which, when used in conjunction with the glazing material, have a light transmittance of no less than [thirty-five] twenty-five per cent plus or minus [six] five per cent; (9)  Side windows which are to the rear of the driver and rear windows on vans, minivans, trucks, or buses; provided that the vehicles are equipped with rearview mirrors on both sides; (10)  Privacy drapes, curtains, or blinds, or any combination, installed on the interior of motor homes; or (11)  Transparent sun screening materials, when applied to the AS-1 portion of the windshield, which meets the requirements of Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard 205." SECTION 3  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________